Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1501
Director; qualifications.

The Director of Motor Vehicles at the time of his appointment and qualification shall (a) be a citizen of the United States and a resident of the State of Nebraska, (b) have been a qualified voter in the state for a period of at least five years preceding his appointment, and (c) not be less than thirty years of age.

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 54, p. 1284.